District of Columbia statutes.
1-1171.07

Applicability.

(a)

This chapter shall apply as of January 29, 2013.

(b)

For an offense committed between January 29, 2013, and March 7, 2013, this chapter shall not be construed to prohibit any conduct that was proscribed under the federal Hatch Act, 5 U.S.C. § 7321 et seq., or this chapter, or authorize any penalties that were not available before March 7, 2013.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-335, § 8, 58 DCR 599
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-80, § 2(h), 61 DCR 169

Congress enacted and the President signed Public Law 112-230 on December 28, 2012, excluding the District of Columbia from the coverage of 5 U.S.C. §§ 7321 through 7326 (Hatch Act).

Public Law 112-230 was approved December 28, 2012, satisfying the applicability requirement of subsection (a) of this section.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined that the fiscal effect of D.C. Law 18-335 has been included in an approved budget and financial plan.

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(h) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-231, December 20, 2013, 61 DCR 3, 20 DCSTAT 2633).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(h) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-25, March 7, 2013, 60 DCR 3986, 20 DCSTAT 485).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(h) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-4, May 18, 2013, 60 DCR 4624, 20 DCSTAT 1268).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-80 rewrote (a), which formerly read “This chapter shall apply upon enactment by the Congress of an act excluding the District of Columbia from the coverage of 5 U.S.C. §§ 7321 through 7326 (Hatch Act)”; and rewrote (b), which formerly read “This chapter shall apply upon inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan”.
Hatch Act retention, § 1-625.01.